Vermont, session 2025-2026, H646.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
* * * Municipal Rules Governing Habitability; Assessment of Fee * * *
Sec. 1. 20 V.S.A. § 2736 is amended to read:
§ 2736. MUNICIPAL ENFORCEMENT
* * *
(g) The Commissioner of Public Safety, in consultation with the
Commissioner of Health, shall publish guidance and model rules for municipal
VT LEG #386180 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.646
2026 Page 2 of 5
determinations of habitability pursuant to 24 V.S.A. § 2291(24). The model
rules shall define habitability, incorporate existing State law governing
building and fire safety, describe the bases for determining health and safety
hazards, and include a recommended administrative appeals process.
Sec. 2. COMMISSIONER OF PUBLIC SAFETY; PUBLICATION OF
MODEL RULES
On or before November 15, 2026, the Commissioner of Public Safety shall
publish the guidance and model rules required by 20 V.S.A. § 2736(g) on the
Department’s website and submit copies of the guidance and model rules to the
House Committee on Government Operations and Military Affairs and the
Senate Committee on Government Operations.
Sec. 3. 24 V.S.A. § 2291 is amended to read:
§ 2291. ENUMERATION OF POWERS
For the purpose of promoting the public health, safety, welfare, and
convenience, a town, city, or incorporated village shall have the following
powers:
* * *
(24)(A) Upon the determination by a municipal building inspector,
health officer, or fire marshal, or other municipal official designated by the
legislative body that a building within the boundaries of the town, city, or
incorporated village is uninhabitable, to:
VT LEG #386180 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.646
2026 Page 3 of 5
(i) apply the uninhabitable property fee to the property pursuant to
section 1539 of this title until the date that the property is maintained or
repaired; or
(ii) recover all expenses incident to the maintenance of the
uninhabitable building with the expenses to constitute a lien on the property in
the same manner and to the same extent as taxes assessed on the grand list, and
all procedures and remedies for the collection of taxes shall apply to the
collection of those expenses; provided, however, that the.
(B) A town, city, or incorporated village has adopted shall adopt
rules to determine governing the habitability of a building and the process for
determining habitability, including provisions for:
(i) criteria for determining the habitability of a building, including:
(I) evidence of desertion or abandonment of the property;
(II) boarded-up or secured portions of the building;
(III) any existing orders or notices that state that the building is
unfit for habitation; and
(IV) partially constructed or demolished portions of a building
that have not been completed and bear evidence of abandonment;
(ii) notice in accordance with 32 V.S.A. § 5252(3) 5252(a)(3) to
the building’s owner prior to incurring expenses and including provisions for
or applying the uninhabitable property fee to the property; and
VT LEG #386180 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.646
2026 Page 4 of 5
(iii) an administrative appeals process.
(C) A town, city, or incorporated village may adopt the model rules
published by the Commissioner of Public Safety as its rules governing the
habitability of a building pursuant to subdivision (B) of this subdivision (24).
* * *
* * * Authority to Impose Fee; Abatement * * *
Sec. 4. 24 V.S.A. § 1535 is amended to read:
§ 1535. ABATEMENT
(a) The board may abate in whole or part taxes, water charges, sewer
charges, interest, collection fees, or any other municipal charges or fees for
utilities or services, or any combination of those, other than those arising out of
a corrected classification of homestead or nonhomestead property, accruing to
the town in the following cases:
* * *
(7) uninhabitable property fees assessed on property that the owner
subsequently maintained or repaired;
* * *
Sec. 5. 24 V.S.A. § 1539 is added to read:
§ 1539. UNINHABITABLE PROPERTY FEE
(a) The legislative body of a city, town, or incorporated village may impose
an annual fee on uninhabitable properties within the municipality. The annual
VT LEG #386180 v.2

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.646
2026 Page 5 of 5
fee on uninhabitable property shall be the greater of one percent of the
appraised value of the property or $5,000.00 and shall be due on the same date
that the municipality collects property taxes.
(b) The fee established pursuant to this section shall only apply to
properties that have been determined to be uninhabitable pursuant to
subdivision 2291(24) of this title, are not subject to administrative appeal
concerning the determination, and have not been maintained or repaired within
30 days after the date of the determination or a decision denying the
administrative appeal of the determination.
(c) Pursuant to section 1535 of this subchapter, the owner of a property
who maintains or repairs the uninhabitable property may request an abatement
of a pro rata portion of the uninhabitable property fee for the year in which the
repairs were made.
* * * Effective Date * * *
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #386180 v.2